Tennessee, session 114, SB1844.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 1, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The plazas located in front of War Memorial Auditorium, formerly known as the
Legislative Plaza and War Memorial Plaza, respectively, are hereafter known and
designated as the "Winfield Dunn War Memorial Plaza".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-2006(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "the Legislative Plaza" and substituting "the Winfield Dunn War Memorial
Plaza".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-4-301(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "War Memorial Plaza" and substituting "Winfield Dunn War Memorial
Plaza".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-111(b)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting the language "Legislative Plaza" and substituting "Winfield Dunn War Memorial Plaza".
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1844
009850
- 1 -